Idaho statutes. Title 1 COURTS AND COURT OFFICIALS
Chapter 8
JUDICIAL DISTRICTS

Section.

§ 1-801. Number of judicial districts — Number of judges — Resident chambers.

The state is divided into seven (7) judicial districts described in this chapter. The number of district judges for each judicial district shall be as described by this chapter. The resident chambers of a district judge within a judicial district shall be as described in this chapter.

§ 1-802. First district — Number of judges — Resident chambers.

The first judicial district shall consist of the counties of Boundary, Bonner, Kootenai, Shoshone, and Benewah.

The first judicial district shall have seven (7) district judges.

Resident chambers of the district judges of the first judicial district shall be established as follows:

Two (2) resident chambers shall be established in Bonner County;

Four (4) resident chambers shall be established in Kootenai County; and

One (1) resident chamber shall be established in Shoshone County.

§ 1-803. Second district — Number of judges — Resident chambers.

The second judicial district shall consist of the counties of Latah, Clearwater, Nez Perce, Lewis and Idaho.

The second judicial district shall have four (4) district judges.

Resident chambers of the district judges of the second judicial district shall be established as follows:

One (1) resident chambers shall be established in Latah County;

Two (2) resident chambers shall be established in Nez Perce County;

One (1) resident chambers shall be established in Idaho County.

§ 1-804. Third district — Number of judges — Resident chambers.

The third judicial district shall consist of the counties of Adams, Washington, Payette, Gem, Canyon and Owyhee.

The third judicial district shall have seven (7) district judges.

Resident chambers of the district judges of the third judicial district shall be established as follows:

One (1) resident chambers shall be established in Washington or Payette County.

Six (6) resident chambers shall be established in Canyon County.

§ 1-805. Fourth district — Number of judges — Resident chambers.

The fourth judicial district shall consist of the counties of Valley, Boise, Ada and Elmore.

The fourth judicial district shall have twelve (12) district judges.

Resident chambers of the district judges of the fourth judicial district shall be established as follows:

Eleven (11) resident chambers shall be established in Ada County;

One (1) resident chambers shall be established in Ada or Elmore County.

§ 1-806. Fifth district — Number of judges — Resident chambers.

The fifth judicial district shall consist of the counties of Blaine, Camas, Gooding, Lincoln, Jerome, Minidoka, Cassia and Twin Falls.

The fifth judicial district shall have seven (7) district judges.

Resident chambers of the district judges of the fifth judicial district shall be established as follows:

One (1) resident chambers shall be established in Blaine County;

One (1) resident chambers shall be established in Minidoka County;

Three (3) resident chambers shall be established in Twin Falls County;

One (1) resident chambers shall be established in Cassia County;

One (1) resident chambers shall be established in Gooding or Jerome County.

§ 1-807. Sixth district — Number of judges — Resident chambers.

The sixth judicial district shall consist of the counties of Power, Bannock, Caribou, Bear Lake, Franklin and Oneida.

The sixth judicial district shall have four (4) district judges.

Resident chambers of the district judges of the sixth judicial district shall be established as follows:

One (1) resident chambers shall be established in Caribou County;

Three (3) resident chambers shall be established in Bannock County.

§ 1-808. Seventh district — Number of judges — Resident chambers.

The seventh judicial district shall consist of the counties of Lemhi, Custer, Butte, Clark, Fremont, Jefferson, Madison, Teton, Bonneville and Bingham.

The seventh judicial district shall have six (6) district judges.

Resident chambers of the district judges of the seventh judicial district shall be established as follows:

One (1) resident chambers shall be established in Madison County;

One (1) resident chambers shall be established in Bingham County;

Three (3) resident chambers shall be established in Bonneville County;

One (1) resident chambers shall be established in Jefferson County.

§ 1-809. Residence requirement of judges.

District judges shall actually reside at the place designated as resident chambers.